District of Columbia statutes.
7-2071.09

Non-retaliation.

A health benefits plan or the HealthCare Alliance shall not take retaliatory action of any sort against a member who seeks assistance from the Ombudsman Program or against a provider who furnishes information to the Ombudsman Program pursuant to a consumer’s request.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-331, § 10, 52 DCR 1981

History